Indiana, session 2026, HB1043.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-64.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 64.5. "Data center", for purposes of IC 14-25-18,
means a facility:
(1) the primary services of which are the storage,
management, and processing of digital data;
(2) that is used to house:
(A) computer and network systems, including associated
components, such as servers, network equipment and
appliances, telecommunications, and data storage systems;
(B) systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure
performance;
(C) Internet related equipment and services;
(D) data communications connections;
(E) environmental controls;
(F) fire protection systems; and
(G) security systems and services; and
2026 IN 1043—LS 6203/DI 153


(3) that has the capability of consuming at least ten million
(10,000,000) gallons of water in one (1) month.
SECTION 2. IC 14-25-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18. Data Center Water Regulation
Sec. 1. A person may not operate a data center in Indiana
without obtaining a consumption permit from the department. A
person must obtain a new consumption permit for each data center
operated by the person.
Sec. 2. (a) A person may consult with the department to evaluate
the viability of a proposed data center with respect to water
consumption.
(b) Upon request of a person described in subsection (a), the
department shall provide a written evaluation of a proposed data
center with respect to water consumption.
(c) If a person requests a written evaluation under subsection
(b), the department may request information and documents
related to the proposed data center from the person, including:
(1) a description of the project;
(2) the project's estimated:
(A) water use rates; and
(B) volumes for the:
(i) maximum day;
(ii) maximum month; and
(iii) average year; and
(3) the anticipated source of water.
(d) Information and documents exchanged under this section
are confidential.
Sec. 3. (a) A person may apply to the department for a
consumption permit in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(b) An application under subsection (a) must include the
following:
(1) An application fee, as determined by the department.
(2) The signature of the applicant.
(3) A statement verifying that the information submitted is
true, accurate, and complete to the best of the applicant's
knowledge.
(4) A description of the data center.
(5) The data center's estimated:
(A) water use rates; and
2026 IN 1043—LS 6203/DI 153


(B) volumes for the:
(i) maximum day;
(ii) maximum month; and
(iii) average year.
(6) The data center's anticipated source of water.
(7) Information demonstrating that the data center will
protect the public health, safety, and welfare.
(8) Information demonstrating that the data center will utilize
technologies or measures to promote:
(A) water conservation; and
(B) watershed health.
(c) An application fee paid under this section is not refundable
by the department.
(d) For purposes of subsection (b), technologies or measures that
promote water conservation and watershed health include:
(1) water efficient fixtures and practices;
(2) recycling water before discharge;
(3) partnering with local water utilities to use discharged
water from the data center;
(4) using reclaimed water;
(5) installing closed loop systems; and
(6) supporting water restoration and replenishment in local
watersheds.
Sec. 4. (a) The department shall review an application submitted
under section 3 of this chapter. If the department determines that
the application submitted under section 3 of this chapter is
complete, the department shall notify the applicant.
(b) The department shall return an application to the applicant
if the department determines that the application is incomplete,
inaccurate, or both.
(c) If the department returns an application to an applicant
under subsection (b), the department shall inform the applicant in
writing that the applicant may file a corrected application not
more than sixty (60) days after the receipt of the returned
application.
(d) Not later than ninety (90) days after notifying the applicant
of a complete application as described in subsection (a), the
department shall approve or deny the application.
Sec. 5. The department may not approve an application if the
data center that is the subject of the application will:
(1) injure the public health, safety, and welfare; or
(2) impair:
2026 IN 1043—LS 6203/DI 153


(A) water conservation; or
(B) watershed health.
Sec. 6. If the department approves an application, the
department shall issue to the applicant a consumption permit.
Sec. 7. A consumption permit may be transferred or assigned
from a person that operates a data center to another person that
intends to operate the data center.
Sec. 8. The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1043—LS 6203/DI 153